Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.40
Visual lead-hazard screen, defined.

Visual lead-hazard screen means a visual assessment to determine the presence of deteriorated paint or other potential sources of lead-based paint hazards in a residential dwelling or child-occupied facility. Visual lead-hazard screen includes a written report explaining the results and limitations of the assessment. The written report will be provided to the person requesting the inspection, the residents of the dwelling, and the owner of the dwelling or child-occupied facility. A licensed visual lead-hazard advisor shall retain a copy of the report in his or her files for three years.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 42;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1272.